Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5785.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 44-18 of the General Laws entitled "Sales and Use Taxes – Liability
and Computation" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
44-18-18.2. Annual Sales Tax Holiday.
(a) Notwithstanding any general or public law to the contrary, for the days of August 9,
2025 and August 10, 2025, sales tax shall not be imposed upon nonbusiness sales at retail of
tangible personal property. For purposes of this section, tangible personal property shall not include
telecommunications, tobacco products, gas, steam, oil, electricity, motor vehicles, motorboats,
meals or a single item whose price exceeds two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).
(b) Notwithstanding any general or public law to the contrary, for the days of August 9,
2025 and August 10, 2025, a vendor shall not add to the sales price, or collect from a nonbusiness
purchaser, an excise upon sales at retail of tangible personal property. The director of the
department of revenue ("the director") shall not require a vendor to collect and pay taxes upon sales
at retail of tangible personal property purchased on August 9, 2025 and August 10, 2025. An excise
erroneously or improperly collected during the days of August 9, 2025 and August 10, 2025, shall
be remitted to the department of revenue.
This section shall not apply to the sale of telecommunications, tobacco products, gas,
steam, oil, electricity, motor vehicles, motorboats, meals or a single item the price of which is in
excess of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

(c) Reporting requirements imposed upon vendors of tangible personal property, by law or
by regulation, including, but not limited to, the requirements for filing returns required pursuant to
the general laws, shall remain in effect for sales for the days of August 9, 2025 and August 10,
2025.
(d) On or before December 31, 2025, the director of the department of revenue shall certify
to the comptroller the amount of sales tax forgone, as well as new revenue raised from personal
and corporate income taxes and other sources pursuant to this section. The director shall file a report
with the house and senate finance committees detailing the distribution of revenues which would
have been deposited in each fund without this section.
(e) The director shall issue instructions or forms, or promulgate rules or regulations, as
necessary for the implementation of this section.
(f) Eligible sales at retail of tangible personal property under subsections (a) and (b) of this
section are restricted to those transactions occurring on August 9, 2025 and August 10, 2025.
Transfer of possession of or payment in full for the property shall occur on one of those days, and
prior sales or layaway sales shall be ineligible.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001846
========
LC001846 - Page 2 of 3